Rhode Island, session 2025, SB34.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 44-18-7.3 of the General Laws in Chapter 44-18 entitled "Sales and
Use Taxes — Liability and Computation" is hereby amended to read as follows:
44-18-7.3. Services defined.
(a) “Services” means all activities engaged in for other persons for a fee, retainer,
commission, or other monetary charge, which activities involve the performance of a service in this
state as distinguished from selling property.
(b) The following businesses and services performed in this state, along with the applicable
2017 North American Industrial Classification System (NAICS) codes, are included in the
definition of services:
(1) Taxicab and limousine Limousine services (485320) including but not limited to:
(i) Taxicab services including taxi dispatchers (485310); and
(ii) Limousine services (485320).
(2) Other road transportation service including but not limited to:
(i) Charter bus service (485510);
(ii) “Transportation network companies” (TNC) defined as an entity that uses a digital
network to connect transportation network company riders to transportation network operators who
provide prearranged rides. Any TNC operating in this state is a retailer as provided in § 44-18-15
and is required to file a business application and registration form and obtain a permit to make sales

at retail with the tax administrator, to charge, collect, and remit Rhode Island sales and use tax; and
(iii) All other transit and ground passenger transportation (485999).
(3) Pet care services (812910) except veterinary and testing laboratories services.
(4)(i) “Room reseller” or “reseller” means any person, except a tour operator as defined in
§ 42-63.1-2, having any right, permission, license, or other authority from or through a hotel as
defined in § 42-63.1-2, to reserve, or arrange the transfer of occupancy of, accommodations the
reservation or transfer of which is subject to this chapter, such that the occupant pays all or a portion
of the rental and other fees to the room reseller or reseller. Room reseller or reseller shall include,
but not be limited to, sellers of travel packages as defined in this section. Notwithstanding the
provisions of any other law, where said reservation or transfer of occupancy is done using a room
reseller or reseller, the application of the sales and use tax under §§ 44-18-18 and 44-18-20, and
the hotel tax under § 44-18-36.1 shall be as follows: The room reseller or reseller is required to
register with, and shall collect and pay to, the tax administrator the sales and use and hotel taxes,
with said taxes being calculated upon the amount of rental and other fees paid by the occupant to
the room reseller or reseller, less the amount of any rental and other fees paid by the room reseller
or reseller to the hotel. The hotel shall collect and pay to the tax administrator said taxes upon the
amount of rental and other fees paid to the hotel by the room reseller or reseller and/or the occupant.
No assessment shall be made by the tax administrator against a hotel because of an incorrect
remittance of the taxes under this chapter by a room reseller or reseller. No assessment shall be
made by the tax administrator against a room reseller or reseller because of an incorrect remittance
of the taxes under this chapter by a hotel. If the hotel has paid the taxes imposed under this chapter,
the occupant and/or room reseller or reseller, as applicable, shall reimburse the hotel for said taxes.
If the room reseller or reseller has paid said taxes, the occupant shall reimburse the room reseller
or reseller for said taxes. Each hotel and room reseller or reseller shall add and collect, from the
occupant or the room reseller or the reseller, the full amount of the taxes imposed on the rental and
other fees. When added to the rental and other fees, the taxes shall be a debt owed by the occupant
to the hotel or room reseller or reseller, as applicable, and shall be recoverable at law in the same
manner as other debts. The amount of the taxes collected by the hotel and/or room reseller or
reseller from the occupant under this chapter shall be stated and charged separately from the rental
and other fees, and shall be shown separately on all records thereof, whether made at the time the
transfer of occupancy occurs, or on any evidence of the transfer issued or used by the hotel or the
room reseller or the reseller. A room reseller or reseller shall not be required to disclose to the
occupant the amount of tax charged by the hotel; provided, however, the room reseller or reseller
shall represent to the occupant that the separately stated taxes charged by the room reseller or
LC000232 - Page 2 of 4

reseller include taxes charged by the hotel. No person shall operate a hotel in this state, or act as a
room reseller or reseller for any hotel in the state, unless the tax administrator has issued a permit
pursuant to § 44-19-1.
(ii) “Travel package” means a room, or rooms, bundled with one or more other, separate
components of travel such as air transportation, car rental, or similar items, which travel package
is charged to the customer or occupant for a single, retail price. When the room occupancy is
bundled for a single consideration, with other property, services, amusement charges, or any other
items, the separate sale of which would not otherwise be subject to tax under this chapter, the entire
single consideration shall be treated as the rental or other fees for room occupancy subject to tax
under this chapter; provided, however, that where the amount of the rental, or other fees for room
occupancy is stated separately from the price of such other property, services, amusement charges,
or other items, on any sales slip, invoice, receipt, or other statement given the occupant, and such
rental and other fees are determined by the tax administrator to be reasonable in relation to the
value of such other property, services, amusement charges, or other items, only such separately
stated rental and other fees will be subject to tax under this chapter. The value of the transfer of any
room, or rooms, bundled as part of a travel package may be determined by the tax administrator
from the room reseller’s and/or reseller’s and/or hotel’s books and records that are kept in the
regular course of business.
(5) Investigation, Guard, and Armored Car Services (561611, 561612 & 561613).
(c) All services as defined herein are required to file a business application and registration
form and obtain a permit to make sales at retail with the tax administrator, to charge, collect, and
remit Rhode Island sales and use tax.
(d) The tax administrator is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations in accordance
with the provisions of chapter 35 of title 42 to carry out the provisions, policies, and purposes of
this chapter.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000232
========
LC000232 - Page 3 of 4